Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 2

Damages

69-5-201. Claims must be filed or waived — Guardian or conservator.

Any person claiming damages as compensation for the construction of a levee, ditch, drain, or watercourse improvement shall file the claim in the office of the county clerk at least three (3) days prior to the day on which the petition has been set for hearing, and on failure to file such claim at the time specified shall be held to have waived such rights; provided, that if such person be an infant and without regular guardian, or an infant or person adjudicated incompetent and such guardian or conservator has not been notified of the proceeding as provided for notice, and the facts are made to appear by affidavit, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for such person, who may file such claim for damages, if deemed proper, for the person within the time above allowed or within three (3) days after being so appointed.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 5; 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 3; Shan., § 3871a31; mod. Code 1932, § 4248; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-801; T.C.A. §69-6-201; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 93.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557.

69-5-202. District not to be established until assessment of damages — Viewers — Duty of engineer.

If any claims for damages have been filed, the court shall not establish the district until viewers have been appointed and have reported, and the court shall proceed to appoint three (3) viewers to assess such damages, who shall be disinterested freeholders of the county, and not related to any party interested in the proposed improvement, nor themselves interested in a like improvement, and the engineer appointed by the county court shall accompany the viewers and furnish such information as may be called for by them concerning the survey of the improvement.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 6; Shan., § 3871a34; Code 1932, § 4251; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-802; T.C.A. §69-6-202.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Cross-References. Compensation of viewers, §69-5-303.

69-5-203. Damages fixed by viewers — Report.

The viewers appointed to assess damages, after being duly sworn to act impartially and faithfully to the best of their ability, shall proceed to view the premises and determine and fix the amount of damages to which each claimant is entitled, and file reports in writing with the county clerk showing the amount of damages to which each claimant would be entitled because of the establishment of the proposed improvement.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 7; Shan., § 3871a35; Code 1932, § 4252; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-803; T.C.A. §69-6-203.

69-5-204. Report to be promptly filed — Substitute viewers.

The report of the viewers shall be filed as soon as practicable. If any one of them fails or refuses to act, for any reason, or does not proceed to act with promptness, the court may appoint another as a viewer in that viewer's place.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 7; Shan., § 3871a36; mod. Code 1932, § 4253; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-804; T.C.A. §69-6-204.

69-5-205. Method of estimating damages.

In estimating the damages, the viewers shall give the value of the land proposed to be taken without deduction, but incidental benefits that may result to the owner by reason of the proposed improvement may be taken into consideration in estimating the incidental damages.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 7; Shan., § 3871a37; Code 1932, § 4254; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-805; T.C.A. §69-6-205.

69-5-206. Damages to be considered before establishing district — Damage awards.

After the filing of the report of the viewers, the court shall consider the amount of damages awarded in deciding whether such levee or drainage district should be established, and if, in its judgment, the probable cost of construction is not a greater burden than should be properly borne by the land benefited by the improvement, and the improvement is conducive to the public health, welfare, benefit, or utility, then the court shall locate and establish such drainage or levee district by proper judgment to be entered of record, and the court shall thereupon proceed to determine the amount of damages sustained by each claimant, and may hear evidence in respect to damages, and may increase or diminish the amount awarded by the viewers, as may seem just and right.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 8; Shan., § 3871a38; Code 1932, § 4255; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-806; T.C.A. §69-6-206.

69-5-207. Damages to be paid or secured by parties benefited by such district.

After the amount of damages due any claimant or claimants has been finally ascertained and fixed by the county court, the court shall require the amount of all such damages to be paid, in the first instance, by the parties benefited by the levee or drainage district, or be secured, to be paid upon such terms and conditions as the county court may deem just and proper.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 9; Shan., § 3871a48; Code 1932, § 4265; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-807; T.C.A. §69-6-207.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-208. Entry of condemnation order.

After damages have been paid, or secured as provided in §69-5-207, the county court shall enter a proper order of condemnation showing all such lands are appropriated and belong to such drainage or levee district for all its necessary purposes.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 9; Shan., § 3871a49; Code 1932, § 4266; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-808; T.C.A. §69-6-208.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-209. Power of condemnation — Extent of appropriation.

In establishing any such district, all necessary lands may be appropriated as provided in this chapter, and a right-of-way as much as two hundred feet (200') wide may be so appropriated, if deemed necessary, for the situs and location of any ditch or drain, or for the location of a new route or channel for any natural watercourse for the whole way or parts of the way of its course. The natural bed of any watercourse in such district may, insofar as it may be utilized and necessary, be so appropriated to the end that such bed or channel may be cleaned out, deepened, or widened; but the provision in this section as to the width of such right-of-way shall not prevent the county court from ordering appropriated such other lands as may be deemed necessary for the purposes of such improvement district under this chapter.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 9; Shan., § 3871a50; Code 1932, § 4267; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-809; T.C.A. §69-6-209.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Cross-References. Method of eminent domain for certain levee and drainage districts, §29-17-901.